Utah statutes.
63G-6a-706.   Correction or withdrawal of proposal -- Cancellation of award.

(1)  Correction or withdrawal of an unintentionally erroneous proposal, or the cancellation of an award or contract that is based on an unintentionally erroneous proposal, may be made in accordance with the rules of the applicable rulemaking authority.

(2)  A decision to permit the correction or withdrawal of a proposal or the cancellation of an award or a contract under Subsection (1) shall be supported in a written document, signed by the procurement officer.



Enacted by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session

